Hawaii statutes.
§46-73 Claims for legislative relief;
conditions. All claims for refunds, reimbursements, or other payments by
any county, authorization for which is sought from the legislature, shall, as a
condition to their being considered by the legislature, be filed in duplicate
with the county council or city council of the county concerned at least thirty
days prior to the convening of the legislature, together with duplicates of all
data and documents in support thereof. In the absence of a showing of sufficient
reason therefor, failure to comply with this paragraph shall be deemed
sufficient cause for refusal of the legislature to consider the claims.

The county council or city council shall
immediately upon receipt thereof refer the claim and data so received by it to
the head of the department, bureau, board or commission concerned, and the
person to whom the reference is made shall immediately investigate the claim,
secure in duplicate all available data and documents bearing thereon, and prior
to the convening of the legislature refer the same back to the county council
or city council with the person's recommendations thereon. The county councils
or city council shall, within five days after the opening of the session,
transmit the claims which have not been paid by the county concerned in an
appropriate legislative bill form, together with all accompanying data so
presented, to the legislature. [L 1943, c 75, §1; RL 1945, §6015; RL 1955,
§138-22; HRS §46-73; am L 1973, c 178, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next